nl: Type gazonstrooier: Strooiwagen; Drop; Handbediend; Duwen; Berijdbaar; Spinner; Achtermaaier; Overig
fi: Nurmikonlevittimen tyyppi: Levitys; Pudottava; Kädessä pidettävä; Työnnettävä; Päältäajettava; Pyörivä; Vedettävä; Muu
en: Lawn spreader type: Broadcast; Drop; Handheld; Push; Ride-on; Spinner; Tow-behind; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de espalhador de grama: Distribuição ampla (broadcast); Queda; Portátil; Push; Passeio; Spinner; Rebocável; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta posipača za travnjak: Rasipač; Kapljica; Ručno; Guranje; Za vožnju; Rotiranje; Vuča; Ostalo
ru: Тип разбрасывателя для газона: Broadcast; Точного высева; Ручная; Толкаемая; Самоходная; Центробежная; Прицепная; Другая
sv: Typ av gräsgödselspridare: Broadcast; Sänkning; Handhållen; Tryck; För åkning; Spinnare; Bogsering; Övrigt
zh-TW: 草坪撒佈機類型: 廣撒型; 下降式; 手持式; 推式; 駕駛式; 旋轉式; 托掛式; 其他
da: Græspredertype: Spredt; Drop; Håndholdt; Skub; Ride-on; Spinner; Trækkende; Andet
ja: 芝生散布機のタイプ: ブロードキャスト; ドロップ; ハンドヘルド; プッシュ; 乗用; スピナー; 牽引式; その他
tr: Çim serpme makinesi tipi: Yayma; Sarkıt; Elde taşınan; İtmeli; Binilebilir; Döner; Arkadan çekmeli; Diğer
pl: Typ siewnika do trawników: Rozsiewacz rzutowy; Grawitacyjny; Ręczny; Pchany; Ride-on; Obrotowy; Ciągany; Pozostałe
bg-BG: Тип разпръсквач за трева: Разпръсквач; Падащо; Ръчно; С натискане; Тракторен тип; Ротационно; Теглещо се; Друго
hu: Fűszóró típusa: Széles sugarú; Csepp alakú; Kézi; Tolós; Ráülős; Forgótányéros; Vontatható; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul de împrăștietor pentru gazon: Împrăștiere; Cu dispersie; De mână; Cu împingere; Cu șa; Cu dispersor rotativ; De tractat; Altele
cs: Typ zahradního rozmetadla: Rotační; Sypací; Ruční; Tlačené; Pojezdové; Odstředivé (rotační); Tažené; Jiné
nb: Plenspredertype: Kringkasting; Slipp; Håndholdt; Trykk; Kjørbar; Spinner; Sleping; Annet
vi: Máy rải phân bón cỏ: Rải rộng; Thả; Cầm tay; Đẩy; Dựa vào; Núm xoay; Kéo theo sau; Khác
th: ประเภทเครื่องพ่นปุ๋ยสนามหญ้า: แบบหว่านกระจาย; ดรอปสาย; แบบมือถือ; ดัน; ขับขี่; ปุ่มหมุน; ลากจูงตามหลัง; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de esparcidor de césped: Adobadora; Volcado; Portátil; Empuje; Motorizado; Giratorio; Arrastrable; Otros
de: Rasenstreuertyp: Streuwagen; Drop; Handgerät; Druck; Zum Fahren; Spinner; Anhänger; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di spandiconcime per prato: Broadcast; Drop; A mano; Spinta; A cavallo; Spinner; A traino; Altro
sk-SK: Typ rozmetávača trávy: Široký; Kvapkací; Ručný; Tlačený; Jazdný; Otočný; Vlečný; Iné
fr: Type d’épandeur de pelouse: À diffusion large; Diminué; Portatif; Pousser; Autoportée; Rotatif; Tracté; Autre
lt-LT: Trąšų barstytuvo tipas: Barstomasis; Nuleidžiamas; Rankinis; Stumiamas; Vairuojamas; Suktukas; Velkamas; Kita
zh-CN: 草坪撒播器: 撒播式; 下落式; 手持式; 手推式; 骑乘式; 旋转式; 拖挂式; 其他
el: Τύπος διασκορπιστή γκαζόν: Broadcast; Βαρύτητας; Χειρός; Ωθούμενος; Με κάθισμα; Περιστροφικός; Ρυμουλκούμενος; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de espalhador de relva: Distribuição ampla; Queda; Manual; De empurrar; Com assento; Rolo; Com reboque; Outro
ko: 잔디 살포기 유형: 브로드캐스트; 드롭; 휴대용; 푸시; 탑승형; 스피너; 견인식; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta trosilnika za trato: Broadcast; Znižan; Ročna; Potisni; Z vožnjo; Spiner; Vleka; Druga